Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2440.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2308(b)(2) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 2308. Unlawful devices and methods.* * *(b) Exceptions.--The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to:* * *(2) * * *(iv) Any licensed hunter, while on private property in an area designated by the commission and using bait to attract deer for removal as provided by commission regulations:(A) to address wildlife disease transmission or 12345678910111213141516171819 habitat degradation or for any other purpose established by commission regulations; or(B) through a special permit issued in accordance with 58 Pa. Code Ch. 147 (relating to special permits).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2440PN3284 - 2 - 1234567